Nevada, session 83, AB397.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.1. NRS 396.544 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.544 1. The Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada may grant a waiver of the payment of registration fees ,
[and] laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees assessed each
semester for any member of the active Nevada National Guard,
including, without limitation, a recruit, who attends a school within
the System as a full-time or part-time student.
2. A member of the active Nevada National Guard who has
reenlisted may, in lieu of using the waiver himself or herself and
regardless of whether the member was granted a waiver pursuant to
this section before reenlistment:
(a) Assign such a waiver to his or her spouse or child for credits
applicable toward the course work required for the award to the
spouse or child of an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree or
certificate at any school within the System.
(b) Reassign such a waiver to his or her spouse or child, as
applicable, if the person to whom the waiver was assigned pursuant
to paragraph (a) does not use the waiver to attend a school within
the System as a full-time or part-time student.
 For each period of reenlistment of a member, the benefit
provided pursuant to this subsection may only be used by one
eligible person.
3. The amount of any waiver granted, assigned or reassigned
pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must be equal to the balance of all
registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed against the person to whom the waiver is granted,
assigned or reassigned, as applicable, remaining for a semester
after the application of all scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance, with the exception of loans, to which the person is
entitled for that semester, including, without limitation:
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
4. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom a waiver is granted, assigned or reassigned pursuant
to subsection 1 or 2, including, without limitation, tuition charges
pursuant to NRS 396.540, such a person shall be deemed to be a
bona fide resident of this State.
[4.] 5. A person must be a member in good standing of the
active Nevada National Guard, including, without limitation, a
recruit, at the beginning of and throughout the entire semester for
which the waiver is granted.
[5.] 6. A person to whom a waiver is granted, assigned or
reassigned pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must [maintain at least a 2.0
grade point average, on a 4.0 grading scale, each semester for which
the waiver is granted, assigned or reassigned, or the equivalent of a
2.0 grade point average if a different grading scale is used.] :
(a) For every year for which the person is granted, assigned or
reassigned a waiver:
(1) If the person is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the person is not eligible to receive federal student aid
for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an alternative
form as may be prescribed by the school in which the person is
enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the person for financial
assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the person is enrolled.
[6.] 7. The Board of Regents may request the Adjutant General
to verify the membership in the active Nevada National Guard of a
person who is seeking or has been granted a waiver of registration
fees and laboratory fees pursuant to subsection 1.
[7.] 8. The Adjutant General shall:
(a) Upon receiving a request from the Board of Regents
pursuant to subsection [6,] 7, notify the Board of Regents in writing
concerning the status and dates of membership of a person who is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
seeking or has been granted a waiver of registration fees and
laboratory fees pursuant to subsection 1.
(b) Maintain a record of any waiver that has been granted,
assigned or reassigned pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 and the person
to whom the waiver was assigned or reassigned.
(c) Before the beginning of each semester, certify in writing to
the Board of Regents that a waiver has been properly assigned or
reassigned to the person seeking to use the waiver to attend a school
within the System.
[8.] 9. If a waiver is granted pursuant to subsection 1 for a
recruit and the recruit does not enter full-time National Guard duty
within 1 year after enlisting, the recruit shall reimburse the Board of
Regents for all registration fees and laboratory fees waived on
behalf of the recruit if the recruit’s failure to enter full-time National
Guard duty is attributable to his or her own conduct.
[9.] 10. As used in this section:
(a) “Full-time National Guard duty” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 32 U.S.C. § 101(19).
(b) “Other mandatory fees” includes, without limitation,
differential program fees, special course fees, student fees and
technology fees.
(c) “Recruit” means a person who has enlisted in the Nevada
National Guard but has not begun his or her required military duty.
[(c)] (d) “Spouse” includes a domestic partner as set forth in
NRS 122A.200.
Sec. 1.2. NRS 396.5442 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5442 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees assessed each semester for a child, widow or
widower of a person who was killed while performing his or her
duties as a member of the Nevada National Guard. For the purpose
of assessing fees and charges against a person to whom such a
waiver is granted, including, without limitation, tuition charges
pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person shall be deemed to be a bona
fide resident of this State.
2. [A person is] The amount of any waiver granted pursuant
to subsection 1 must be equal to the balance of all registration
fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees assessed
against the person to whom the waiver is granted remaining for
the semester after the application of all scholarships, grants and
other financial assistance, with the exception of loans, to which
the person is entitled for that semester, including, without
limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
3. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 [if the
person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0 grading
scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point average if
a different scale is used.] , a person must:
(a) For every year for which the person seeks a waiver:
(1) If the person is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the person is not eligible to receive federal student aid
for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an alternative
form as may be prescribed by the school in which the person is
enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the person for financial
assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the person is enrolled.
[3.] 4. A child may use a waiver granted pursuant to this
section for 10 years after the child attains the age of 18 years or, if
the child enrolls in the System before the age of 18 years, for 10
years after the date of such enrollment. A widow or widower may
use a waiver granted pursuant to this section for 10 years after the
date of the death of the member.
[4.] 5. The Board of Regents may request the Adjutant General
to verify that a person is the child, widow or widower of a person
who was killed while performing his or her duties as a member of
the Nevada National Guard. The Adjutant General shall, upon
receiving such a request, notify the Board of Regents in writing
concerning the status of that person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
6. As used in this section, “other mandatory fees” includes,
without limitation, differential program fees, special course fees,
student fees and technology fees.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 396.5443 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5443 1. The Board of Regents shall grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees assessed each semester against a student who is:
(a) A veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States who has
been awarded the Purple Heart; or
(b) The child of such a veteran, if:
(1) The veteran is a bona fide resident of this State, or was a
bona fide resident of this State at the time of his or her death; and
(2) The child of the veteran graduated from a high school
located in this State.
2. The amount of [the] any waiver granted pursuant to
subsection 1 must be equal to [:
(a) If the student is entitled to receive any federal educational
benefits for a semester, the balance of registration fees, laboratory
fees and any other mandatory fees assessed against the student that
remain unpaid after the student’s account has been credited with the
full amount of the federal educational benefits to which the student
is entitled for that semester; or
(b) If the student is not entitled to receive any federal
educational benefits for a semester, the full amount of the
registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed against the student for that semester.] the balance of all
registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed against the student for a semester remaining after the
application of all scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance, with the exception of loans, to which the student is
entitled for that semester, including, without limitation:
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
3. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1, a
student must:
(a) For every year for which the student seeks a waiver:
(1) If the student is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the student is not eligible to receive federal student
aid for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an
alternative form as may be prescribed by the school in which the
person is enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the student for
financial assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the student is enrolled.
4. The waiver must be granted to a student who enrolls in any
program offered by a school within the System, including, without
limitation, a trade or vocational program, a graduate program or a
professional program.
[4.] 5. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
student to whom a waiver is granted pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS
396.540, such a student shall be deemed to be a bona fide resident of
this State.
[5.] 6. The Board of Regents may grant more favorable waivers
of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees for
veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States who have been
awarded the Purple Heart or the child of such a veteran than the
waiver provided pursuant to this section if required for the receipt of
federal money.
[6.] 7. A child of a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United
States who has been awarded the Purple Heart may use a waiver
granted pursuant to this section for 10 years after the child attains 18
years of age, or, if the child enrolls in the System before attaining 18
years of age, for 10 years after the date of such enrollment.
8. As used in this section, “other mandatory fees” includes,
without limitation, differential program fees, special course fees,
student fees and technology fees.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Sec. 1.4. NRS 396.5445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5445 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees assessed each semester for a spouse or child of a
person who is identified as a prisoner of war or missing in action
while performing his or her duties as a member of the Armed Forces
of the United States. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges
against a person to whom such a waiver is granted, including,
without limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS 396.540, the
person shall be deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
2. [A person is] The amount of any waiver granted pursuant
to subsection 1 must be equal to the balance of all registration
fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees assessed
against the person to whom the waiver is granted remaining for a
semester after the application of all scholarships, grants and other
financial assistance, with the exception of loans, to which the
person is entitled for that semester, including, without limitation:
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
3. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 [if the
person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0 grading
scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point average if
a different scale is used.] , a person must:
(a) For every year for which the person seeks a waiver:
(1) If the person is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the person is not eligible to receive federal student aid
for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an alternative
form as may be prescribed by the school in which the person is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the person for financial
assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the person is enrolled.
[3.] 4. A spouse may use a waiver granted pursuant to this
section for 10 years after the date on which the member of the
Armed Forces was identified as a prisoner of war or missing in
action. A child may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section for
10 years after the child attains the age of 18 years or, if the child
enrolls in the System before the age of 18 years, for 10 years after
the date of such enrollment.
[4.] 5. The Board of Regents may request such documentation
as it deems necessary to verify that a person is the spouse or child of
a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is
identified as a prisoner of war or missing in action while performing
his or her duties as a member of the Armed Forces.
6. As used in this section, “other mandatory fees” includes,
without limitation, differential program fees, special course fees,
student fees and technology fees.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 396.5446 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5446 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of not
less than half of the total registration fees , laboratory fees and all
other mandatory fees assessed each semester for a veteran who is a
bona fide resident of this State if:
(a) The veteran has completed a bachelor’s degree and is
enrolled in or plans to enroll in a graduate degree program within
the fields of science, technology, engineering, arts, mathematics or
health science designated as a critical need occupation by the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation pursuant to
NRS 232.932; and
(b) The veteran or a third party will pay the remainder of the
registration fees and other fees of the graduate degree program.
 For the purpose of this subsection, a scholarship or a waiver of
registration fees or other fees received by the veteran for any reason
other than this subsection is deemed to be a payment by a third
party.
2. [A veteran is] The amount of any waiver granted pursuant
to subsection 1 must be equal to not less than half of the balance
of all registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees assessed against the veteran to whom the waiver is granted
remaining for a semester after the application of all scholarships,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
grants and other financial assistance, with the exception of loans,
to which the veteran is entitled for that semester, including,
without limitation:
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
3. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 [if the
veteran maintains at least a 2.75 grade point average, on a 4.0
grading scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.75 grade point
average if a different scale is used.] , a veteran must:
(a) For every year for which the veteran seeks a waiver:
(1) If the veteran is eligible to receive federal student aid
for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the veteran is not eligible to receive federal student
aid for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an
alternative form as may be prescribed by the school in which the
veteran is enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the veteran
for financial assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the veteran is enrolled.
[3.] 4. As used in this section [, “veteran”] :
(a) “Other mandatory fees” includes, without limitation,
differential program fees, special course fees, student fees and
technology fees.
(b) “Veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 1.6. NRS 396.5448 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5448 1. The Board of Regents [may] shall grant a waiver
of the payment of registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and all
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
other mandatory fees assessed each semester for a person who [is
identified as a homeless or unaccompanied pupil.] :
(a) Is 25 years of age or less on the date on which the person
enrolls in the System;
(b) Is enrolled in the System as a full-time or part-time
undergraduate student; and
(c) For a period of not less than 6 months at any time after the
person attained the age of 13 years, was an unaccompanied youth
and, during that period of time was also:
(1) A homeless youth; or
(2) Self-supporting and at risk of becoming a homeless
youth.
2. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom such a waiver is granted, including, without
limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person shall
be deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
[2. A person is]
3. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 [if the
person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0 grading
scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point average if
a different scale is used.
3. A person may use a waiver granted pursuant to subsection 1
for 10 years after the person attains the age of 18 years or, if the
person enrolls in the System before the age of 18 years, for 10 years
after the date of such enrollment.] , a person must:
(a) For every year for which the person seeks a waiver:
(1) If the person is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the person is not eligible to receive federal student aid
for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an alternative
form as may be prescribed by the school in which the person is
enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the person for financial
assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the person is enrolled.
4. The Board of Regents [may] shall request documentation
from a person requesting a waiver pursuant to subsection 1
[as it deems necessary] to verify that such a person [was a homeless
or unaccompanied pupil.] meets the criteria described in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
paragraph (c) of subsection 1, which may include, without
limitation, documentation which meets the standards under 20
U.S.C. § 1087uu-2 and related federal regulations.
5. The amount of any waiver granted pursuant to subsection
1 must be equal to the balance of all registration fees, laboratory
fees and any other mandatory fees assessed against the person to
whom the waiver is granted remaining for a semester after the
application of all scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance, with the exception of loans, to which the person is
entitled for that semester, including, without limitation:
(a) Federal student aid;
(b) Federal educational benefits;
(c) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.911 to
396.945, inclusive;
(d) Grants awarded pursuant to the Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program pursuant to NRS 396.950 to 396.960, inclusive;
(e) Scholarships awarded pursuant to the Nevada Promise
Scholarship Program pursuant to NRS 396.961 to 396.9685,
inclusive; and
(f) Any other scholarships, grants and other financial
assistance provided or awarded by the Board of Regents or any
other State entity.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Homeless [pupil”] youth” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “homeless children and youths” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(b) “Other mandatory fees” includes, without limitation,
differential program fees, special course fees, student fees and
technology fees.
(c) “Unaccompanied [pupil”] youth” has the meaning ascribed
to [the term “unaccompanied youth”] it in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(6).
Sec. 1.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.8. NRS 396.5449 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5449 1. The Board of Regents shall grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees assessed each semester against a student who:
(a) Is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation
or certified by the enrollment department of such a tribe or nation or
by the Bureau of Indian Affairs as being a descendant of an enrolled
member of a tribe or nation, regardless of membership status;
(b) Is eligible for enrollment in a school within the System,
including, without limitation, enrollment in a dual credit course
through a program for dual credit; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(c) [Is:] Who:
(1) [A bona fide resident of this State, as defined in
NRS 396.540;
(2) A] Is a member or descendant of an enrolled member of
an Indian tribe or nation, all or part of which is located within the
boundaries of this State [; or
(3) Currently a resident on qualified tribal land, whether] ,
regardless of whether his or her actual residence [was] is located
within or outside of the boundaries of this State [, and has been such
a resident for not less than 1 year;
(d) Has maintained at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point average if
a different scale is used; and
(e) Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid
provided for by 20 U.S.C. § 1090] ;
(2) Has obtained a high school diploma awarded by a
public or private high school located in this State;
(3) Has successfully completed the high school equivalency
assessment selected by the State Board of Education pursuant to
NRS 390.055, if the assessment was administered in this State;
(4) Is currently enrolled in a public or private high school
located in this State; or
(5) Is a descendant of a person who formerly attended the
Stewart Indian School.
2. To be eligible for a waiver pursuant to section 1, a student
must:
(a) For every year for which the student seeks a waiver, unless
the student is or will be enrolled exclusively in one or more dual
credit courses through a program for dual credit [.] :
(1) If the student is eligible to receive federal student aid for
that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. §
1090; or
(2) If the student is not eligible to receive federal student
aid for that year pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1091, complete an
alternative form as may be prescribed by the school in which the
student is enrolled to evaluate the financial needs of the person for
financial assistance.
(b) Meet satisfactory academic progress, as defined by federal
requirements established pursuant to Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., and determined
by the school in which the student is enrolled.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
[2.] 3. The amount of the waiver must be equal to the full
amount of the registration fees, laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees assessed against the student for that semester.
[3.] 4. The waiver must be granted to a student who enrolls in
any course or program, whether for a degree or not, offered by a
school within the System, including, without limitation, a trade or
vocational program, a graduate program, a professional program or
a dual credit course through a program for dual credit, offered
during any academic period, including courses offered during the
summer and between terms or semesters.
[4.] 5. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom such a waiver is granted, the person shall be
deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
[5.] 6. The Board of Regents may request documentation
confirming that the student is a member or descendant of a member
of a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Other mandatory fees” includes, without limitation,
differential program fees, special course fees, student fees and
technology fees.
(b) “Program for dual credit” means a program through which a
pupil enrolled in high school, including, without limitation, a pupil
enrolled in grade 9, 10, 11 or 12 in a charter school or a pupil
enrolled in a program designed to meet the requirements of an adult
standard diploma, may enroll in a dual credit course offered by a
school within the System.
[(b) “Qualified tribal land” means any real property:
(1) For which legal title is vested in, or held in trust for the
benefit of, an Indian tribe or an individual Native American, and
which is subject to restrictions against alienation pursuant to federal
law; and
(2) Over which a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation,
all or part of which is located within the boundaries of this State,
exercises governmental power.]
Sec. 1.9. 1. If, during the period beginning on July 1, 2024,
and ending on July 1, 2026, the Board of Regents of the University
of Nevada granted a waiver of fees pursuant to NRS 396.5449 to a
student who, as of July 1, 2026, is enrolled in any program at a
school within the Nevada System of Higher Education, the Board of
Regents shall grant a waiver of the payment of the portion of
registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees that
would otherwise be waived for the student by the Board of Regents
pursuant to NRS 396.5449, as that section existed on July 1, 2024.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
2. A person may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section
until July 1, 2030.
3. The Board of Regents may establish policies and procedures
to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 396.620, 396.630, 396.640, 396.650 and 396.660
are hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and sections 1.8, 1.9 and 2 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 1.7, inclusive, of this act become effective on
July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)